Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1,138
Violation of final order; liability; penalty.

(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of a final order issued by the director shall be liable to any person or entity who suffers damage proximately caused by such violation.

(2) Any person who knowingly violates any final order issued by the director pursuant to section 8-1,134 is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 1039, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 128.